South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S494.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - Commissioners of Pilotage, relating to Commissioners of Pilotage, designated as Regulation Document Number 5300, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The Commissioners of Pilotage for the Lower Coastal area propose to amend the following sections of the Code of Regulations: R.136-012, R.136-013, R.136-015, R.136-060, R.136-061, and R.136-075. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on July 26, 2024. ----XX----